Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.020

Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter apply to all code cities except those which have adopted an ordinance under RCW 35A.34.040 providing for a biennial budget. In addition, this chapter shall not apply to any municipal utility or enterprise for which separate budgeting provisions are made by general state law.

[ 1985 c 175 s 33; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.020.]